en: Grip shape: Armlock/Extended; Counter-balance; Ergonomic Wing; Flanged; Flangeless; Flat Top/Flatso; Full Waffle; Half Waffle; Mushroom; Oversize Pistol; Oversize Round; Paddle; Pistol; Pyramid; Quad/Square; Round; Round/Straight; Other
ja: グリップShapes: アームロック/エクステンデッド; カウンターバランス; エルゴノミックウィング; フランジ付き; フランジなし; フラットトップ/フラッツォ; フルワッフル; ハーフワッフル; マッシュルーム; オーバーサイズピストル; オーバーサイズラウンド; パドル; ピストル; ピラミッド; クアッド/スクエア; ラウンド; ラウンド/ストレート; その他
da: Grebsform: Armlock/forlænget; Kontravægt; Ergonomisk vinge; Med krave; Uden krave; Flad top/Flatso; Fuld vaffel; Halv vaffel; Svampeformet; Oversize Pistol; Oversize rund; Pagaj; Pistol; Pyramide; Kvadratisk/firkantet; Rund; Rund/lige; Andet
pt-PT: Forma de pegada: Armlock/estendido; Contrabalanço; Asa ergonómica; Com flange; Sem flange; Topo plano/flatso; Waffle completo; Meio waffle; Cogumelo; Pistola oversize; Redondo grande; Pá; Pistola; Pirâmide; Quadrado; Redondo; Redondo/direito; Outro
ru: Форма грипа: Armlock/удлиненная; С противовесом; Эргономичное крыло; С фланцем; Без фланца; Плоский верх (Flatso); Полная вафля; Полувафля; Грибок; Крупный пистолетный; Крупный круглый; Лопатка; Пистолетный; Пирамида; Квадратный (Quad); Круглый; Круглый/прямой; Другое
es: Forma de empuñadura: Armlock/extendido; Contrapeso; Aleta ergonómica; Con brida; Sin brida; Parte superior plana/flatso; Waffle completo; Medio waffle; Hongo; Pistola extragrande; Redondo extragrande; Paleta; Pistola; Pirámide; Cuadrado/cuádruple; Redondo; Redondo/recto; Otro
fi: Kahvan muoto: Armlock/pidennetty; Tasapainotettu; Ergonominen siipi; Laipallinen; Laipaton; Litteä yläosa / Flatso; Koko vohveli; Puolivohveli; Sieni; Ylisuuri pistooli; Ylisuuri pyöreä; Mela; Pistooli; Pyramidi; Neliö; Pyöreä; Pyöreä/suora; Muu
cs: Tvar gripu: Armlock/Prodloužený; Protiváha; Ergonomické křidélko; S přírubou; Bez příruby; Plochý vršek / Flatso; Plný vzor waffle; Poloviční vzor waffle; Hříbek; Oversize Pistol; Oversize kulatý; Pádlo; Pistol; Pyramida; Čtyřhranný / Čtvercový; Kulatý; Kulatý/Rovný; Ostatní
sl-SI: Oblika ročaja: Armlock/podaljšan; Z uravnoteženo težo; Ergonomska krila; S prirobnico; Brez prirobnice; Ravni vrh/Flatso; Polni vafljast vzorec; Polovični vafljast vzorec; Gobast; Velik pištolski; Velik okrogel; Lopatast; Pištolski; Piramidni; Kvadratni; Okrogli; Okrogli/ravni; Drugo
vi: Hình dạng tay cầm: Armlock/mở rộng; Đối trọng; Cánh công thái học; Có vành; Không có vành; Đỉnh phẳng/Flatso; Kiểu tổ ong toàn bộ; Kiểu tổ ong một nửa; Hình nấm; Kiểu súng lục cỡ lớn; Tròn cỡ lớn; Hình mái chèo; Kiểu súng lục; Hình chóp; Khối tư/Hình vuông; Tròn; Tròn/Thẳng; Khác
lt-LT: Rankenos forma: Rankos užraktas („Armlock“) / prailgintas; Su atsvara; Ergonomiškas sparnas; Su flanšu; Be flanšo; Plokščiu viršumi („Flatso“); Pilnas vaflinis („Full Waffle“); Pusinis vaflinis („Half Waffle“); Grybo formos; Padidinto pistoleto formos; Padidintas apvalus; Irklo formos; Pistoleto formos; Piramidės formos; Keturkampis / kvadratinis; Apvalus; Apvalus / tiesus; Kita
nb: Grepform: Armlås/forlenget; Motvekt; Ergonomisk vinge; Med flens; Uten flens; Flat topp/Flatso; Helvaffel; Halvvaffel; Sopp; Overdimensjonert pistol; Overdimensjonert rund; Åre; Pistol; Pyramide; Firkantet/kvadratisk; Rund; Rund/rett; Annet
it: Shapesdell'impugnatura: Armlock/esteso; Controbilanciato; Ad alette ergonomiche; Flangiato; Senza flangia; Flat Top/Flatso; Full Waffle; Half Waffle; A fungo; Pistol oversize; Rotondo oversize; A paletta; Pistol; A piramide; Quadrato; Rotondo; Rotondo/dritto; Altro
nl: Gripvorm: Armlock/verlengd; Counter-balance; Ergonomische vleugel; Met flens; Zonder flens; Platte bovenkant/Flatso; Volledige wafel; Halve wafel; Paddenstoel; Oversize pistool; Oversize rond; Peddel; Pistool; Piramide; Quad/vierkant; Rond; Rond/recht; Overig
zh-CN: 握把形状: 小臂锁定/加长型; 配重型; 人体工学翼型; 带法兰; 无法兰; 平顶/Flatso型; 全华夫格; 半华夫格; 蘑菇头型; 大号手枪型; 大号圆形; 桨型; 手枪型; 金字塔形; 四边/方形; 圆形; 圆形/直筒; 其他
ko: 그립 Shapes: 암락/확장형; 카운터 밸런스; 인체공학적 윙; 플랜지형; 플랜지 없는 형태; 플랫 탑/플랫소; 풀 와플; 하프 와플; 머쉬룸; 오버사이즈 피스톨; 오버사이즈 라운드; 패들; 피스톨; 피라미드; 쿼드/스퀘어; 라운드; 라운드/스트레이트; 기타
pl: Kształt chwytu: Armlock / Przedłużony; Z przeciwwagą; Ergonomiczne skrzydełko; Z kołnierzem; Bez kołnierza; Płaska góra / Flatso; Pełny wafel; Pół wafla; Grzybek; Oversize Pistol; Oversize Round; Wiosło; Pistol; Piramida; Czworokąt / Kwadrat; Okrągły; Okrągły / Prosty; Inne
pt-BR: Empunhadura formato: Armlock/Estendido; Contrapeso; Asa ergonômica; Com flange; Sem flange; Topo plano/Flatso; Waffle completo; Meio Waffle; Cogumelo; Pistol oversize; Redondo oversize; Remo; Pistola; Pirâmide; Quadrado; Redondo; Redondo/Reto; Outro
ro-RO: Forma mânerului de prindere: Armlock/extins; Contragreutate; Aripă ergonomică; Cu flanșă; Fără flanșă; Partea superioară plată/Flatso; Waffle complet; Semi-waffle; Ciupercă; Pistol supradimensionat; Rotund supradimensionat; Paletă; Pistol; Piramidă; Cvadruplu/pătrat; Rotund; Rotund/drept; Altele
zh-TW: 握把形狀: 臂鎖/加長型; 配重型; 人體工學翼型; 帶凸緣; 無凸緣; 平頂/Flatso; 全格紋; 半格紋; 蘑菇狀; 特大號手槍型; 特大號圓形; 槳型; 手槍型; 金字塔形; 四邊/方形; 圓形; 圓形/直立型; 其他
tr: Kavrama şekli: Kol kilidi / Uzatılmış; Karşı ağırlık; Ergonomik Kanat; Flanşlı; Flanşsız; Düz Üst/Flatso; Tam Waffle; Yarım Waffle; Mantar; Büyük Boy Tabanca; Büyük Boy Yuvarlak; Paddle; Tabanca; Piramit; Dörtgen/Kare; Yuvarlak; Yuvarlak/Düz; Diğer
el: Σχήμα λαβής: Armlock/Εκτεταμένο; Αντίβαρο (Counter-balance); Εργονομικό φτερό (Ergonomic Wing); Με φλάντζα; Χωρίς φλάντζα; Επίπεδη κορυφή/Flatso; Πλήρες waffle; Μισό waffle; Μανιτάρι; Oversize Pistol; Oversize Round; Κουπί (Paddle); Pistol; Πυραμίδα; Τετράγωνο (Quad/Square); Στρογγυλό; Στρογγυλό/Ίσιο; Άλλο
sv: Greppform: Armlock/förlängd; Motvikt; Ergonomisk vinge; Med fläns; Utan fläns; Platt topp/Flatso; Helvåfflad; Halvvåfflad; Svamp; Oversize pistol; Oversize rund; Paddel; Pistol; Pyramid; Kvadratisk/fyrkantig; Rund; Rund/rak; Övrigt
sk-SK: Tvar úchopu: Armlock/predĺžený; S protizávažím (Counter-balance); Ergonomické krídlo; S prírubou; Bez príruby; Plochý vrch/Flatso; S úplným vafľovým vzorom; S polovičným vafľovým vzorom; Hríbový; Oversize Pistol; Oversize oblý; Pádlo (Paddle); Pistol; Pyramídový; Štvorcový; Okrúhly; Okrúhly/rovný; Iné
de: Form des Griffs: Armlock/Erweitert; Gegengewicht; Ergonomischer Flügel; Mit Flansch; Ohne Flansch; Flat Top/Flatso; Full Waffle; Half Waffle; Pilz; Oversize-Pistole; Oversize-Rund; Paddel; Pistole; Pyramide; Quad/Square; Rund; Rund/Gerade; Sonstige
th: รูปร่างมือจับ: อาร์มล็อก/ส่วนขยาย; เคาน์เตอร์บาลานซ์; ปีกตามหลักสรีรศาสตร์; มีขอบ; ไม่มีขอบ; ด้านบนแบน/Flatso; วาฟเฟิลเต็มแผ่น; วาฟเฟิลครึ่งแผ่น; ทรงเห็ด; Pistol ขนาดโอเวอร์ไซส์; ทรงกลมโอเวอร์ไซส์; ทรงไม้พาย; ทรง Pistol; ทรงพีระมิด; สี่เหลี่ยม; ทรงกลม; ทรงกลม/ทรงตรง; อื่นๆ
hu: Markolat formája: Armlock/Meghosszabbított; Kiegyensúlyozott; Ergonomikus szárny; Peremes; Perem nélküli; Lapos tetejű/Flatso; Teljesen rácsos; Félig rácsos; Gomba; Túlméretezett pisztoly; Túlméretezett kerek; Evezőlapát; Pisztoly; Piramis; Négyszögletes; Kerek; Kerek/egyenes; Egyéb
fr: Forme du grip: Armlock/allongé; Contrepoids; Ailette ergonomique; À bride; Sans bride; Dessus plat/Flatso; Gaufré (complet); Demi-gaufré; Champignon; Pistolet surdimensionné; Rond surdimensionné; Pagaie; Pistolet; Pyramide; Quadrilatère/carré; Rond; Rond/droit; Autre
hr-HR: Oblik hvata: Armlock/produženo; Protuteža (Counter-balance); Ergonomsko krilo; S prirubnicom; Bez prirubnice; Ravni vrh / Flatso; Puna mrežasta tekstura (Full Waffle); Polovična mrežasta tekstura (Half Waffle); Gljiva; Predimenzionirani pištoljski hvat; Predimenzionirani okrugli hvat; Lopatica (Paddle); Pištoljski hvat; Piramida; Kvadratni; Okrugli; Okrugli/ravni; Ostalo
bg-BG: Форма на ръкохватката: Закопчаване за ръката/удължена (Armlock); С противотежест; Ергономично крило; С фланец; Без фланец; Плосък връх/Flatso; Пълна гофрета (Full Waffle); Полугофрета (Half Waffle); Гъба; Голям размер Pistol; Голям размер кръгла; Гребло; Пистолет; Пирамида; Четворна/Квадратна; Кръгла; Кръгла/Права; Друго